Hawaii, session 2025, SB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Anemonia majano, or the majano anemone, is an invasive species that was detected in Kaneohe Bay during the follow-up monitoring of a previous non-native coral removal site.  Majano anemone, originally introduced as a hitchhiker on the released non-native corals, has spread to blanket an area of about nine hundred fifty square yards.  This invasive anemone severely threatens Kaneohe Bay's delicate coral reef ecosystem, particularly the endemic finger coral Porites compressa.  Known for its rapid growth and spread throughout various substrates, aggressive competition for space, and ability to smother native coral species, the majano anemone has previously outcompeted stony corals in the Philippines and Vietnam, resulting in phase shifts to corallimorpharia-dominated communities.  Left unchecked, the majano anemone could significantly degrade reef health and fish habitat, harm marine biodiversity, and disrupt vital ecosystem services relied upon by the coastal communities in Hawaii. The legislature further finds that the department of land and natural resources' division of aquatic resources has proposed a multi-phase removal strategy tailored to the biology of the majano anemone that involves chemical control and physical removal and smothering practices.  Supporting these efforts may prevent further damage and spread of the majano anemone, ensuring that the State's coral reefs and marine ecosystems remain health and vibrant. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to support the efforts of the division of aquatic resources in the removal of the majano anemone from Kaneohe Bay. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the division of aquatic resources in removing majano anemone from Kaneohe Bay, including personnel, materials and equipment, data management and analysis, and outreach and community engagement. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________